Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XXIIA. NEWBORN PULSE OXIMETRY SCREENING]

Revision Note

Part heading added pursuant to §23G-15.

[§321-296] Newborn pulse oximetry
screening. (a) Prior to discharge of any newborn in its care, a birthing
facility shall perform on the newborn a pulse oximetry test for critical
congenital heart defects or other medically accepted test that measures the
percentage of blood oxygen saturation, as approved by the guidelines of the
American Academy of Pediatrics.

(b) Subsection (a) shall not apply if the
parents, guardians, or other persons having custody or control of the newborn
object to performance of the test required by subsection (a) on the grounds
that the test conflicts with their religious tenets and beliefs and written
objection is made a part of the newborn's medical record.

(c) Each birthing facility shall report
critical congenital heart defect screening data to the department of health for
quality assurance and improvement activities. At a minimum, the data shall
include:

(1) Newborns screened and not screened;

(2) The timing of screening after birth;

(3) Pulse oximetry results;

(4) The outcomes of newborns who fail pulse oximetry
screening; and

(5) Infants who are detected with a critical
congenital heart defect and who pass pulse oximetry screening.

(d) For the purposes of this section,
"birthing facility" means an inpatient or ambulatory health care
facility licensed by the department of health that provides birthing and
newborn care services. [L 2015, c 212, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next